North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 4. Corporate Limits.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 160A-21.
Existing boundaries.

The boundaries of each city shall be those specified in its charter with any alterations that are made from time to time in the manner provided by law or by local act of the General Assembly.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1984 survey, “Competitive Annexation Among Municipalities: North Carolina Adopts the Prior Jurisdiction Rule,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1260 (1985).

§ 160A-22.
Map of corporate limits.

The current city boundaries shall at all times be drawn on a map, or set out in a written description, or shown by a combination of these techniques. This delineation shall be retained permanently in the office of the city clerk. Alterations in these established boundaries shall be indicated by appropriate entries upon or additions to the map or description made by or under the direction of the officer charged with that duty by the city charter or by the council. Copies of the map or description reproduced by any method of reproduction that gives legible and permanent copies, when certified by the city clerk, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts and shall have the same force and effect as would the original map or description. The council may provide for revisions in any map or other description of the city boundaries. A revised map or description shall supersede for all purposes the earlier map or description that it is designated to replace.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 10.

§ 160A-23.
District map; reapportionment.

If the city is divided into electoral districts for the purpose of electing the members of the council, the map or description required by

G.S. 160A-22

shall also show the boundaries of the several districts.

The council shall have authority to revise electoral district boundaries from time to time. If district boundaries are set out in the city charter and the charter does not provide a method for revising them, the council may revise them only for the purpose of (i) accounting for territory annexed to or excluded from the city, and (ii) correcting population imbalances among the districts shown by a new federal census or caused by exclusions or annexations. When district boundaries have been established in conformity with the federal Constitution, the council shall not be required to revise them again until a new federal census of population is taken or territory is annexed to or excluded from the city, whichever event first occurs. In establishing district boundaries, the council may use data derived from the most recent federal census and shall not be required to use any other population estimates.

History.

1969, c. 629; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Local Modification.

City of Greensboro: 2015-138, s. 2(b), as amended by 2015-264, s. 85.5.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Political Gerrymandering After Davis v. Bandemer,” see 9 Campbell L. Rev. 207 (1987).

For article, “Racial Gerrymandering and the Voting Rights Act in North Carolina,” see 9 Campbell L. Rev. 255 (1987).

For article, “Reconstructing Racially Polarized Voting,” see 70 Duke L.J. 261 (2020).

For article, “Math for the People:
Reining in Gerrymandering While Protecting Minority Rights,” see 98 N.C.L. Rev. 273 (2020).

§ 160A-23.1.
Special rules for redistricting after a federal decennial census.

As soon as possible after receipt of federal decennial census information, the council of any city which elects the members of its governing board on a district basis, or where candidates for such office must reside in a district in order to run, shall evaluate the existing district boundaries to determine whether it would be lawful to hold the next election without revising districts to correct population imbalances. If such revision is necessary, the council shall consider whether it will be possible to adopt the changes (and obtain approval from the United States Department of Justice, if necessary) before the third day before opening of the filing period for the municipal election. The council shall take into consideration the time that will be required to afford ample opportunities for public input. If the council determines that it most likely will not be possible to adopt the changes (and obtain federal approval, if necessary) before the third business day before opening of the filing period, and determines further that the population imbalances are so significant that it would not be lawful to hold the next election using the current electoral districts, it may adopt a resolution delaying the election so that it will be held on the timetable provided by subsection (d) of this section. Before adopting such a resolution, the council shall hold a public hearing on it. The notice of public hearing shall summarize the proposed resolution and shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, not less than seven days before the date fixed for the hearing. Notwithstanding adoption of such a resolution, if the council proceeds to adopt the changes, (and federal approval is obtained, if necessary) by the end of the third business day before the opening of the filing period, the election shall be held on the regular schedule under the revised electoral districts. Any resolution adopted under this subsection, and any changes in electoral district boundaries made under this section shall be submitted to the United States Department of Justice (if the city is covered under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965), the State Board of Elections, and to the board conducting the elections for that city.

In adopting any revisal under this section, if the council determines that in order for the plan to conform to the Voting Rights Act of 1965, the number of district seats needs to be increased or decreased, it may do so by following the procedures set forth in Part 4 of Article 5 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, except that the ordinance under

G.S. 160A-102

may be adopted at the same meeting as the public hearing, and any referendum on the change under

G.S. 160A-103

shall not apply to the municipal election in the two years following a federal decennial census.

If the resolution provided for in subsection (a) of this section is not adopted and:

Proposed changes to the electoral districts are not adopted, or

Such changes are adopted, but approval under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, is required, and notice of such approval is not received,

by the end of the third business day before the opening of the filing period, the election shall be held on the regular schedule using the current electoral districts.

If the council adopts the resolution provided for in subsection (a) of this section and does not adopt the changes, or does adopt the changes, but approval under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, is required, and notice of such approval is not received, by the end of the third day before the opening of the filing period, the municipal election shall be rescheduled as provided in this subsection and current officeholders shall hold over until their successors are elected and qualified. For cities using the:

Partisan primary and election method under

G.S. 163-291

, the primary shall be held on the primary election date for county officers in the second year following a federal decennial census, the second primary, if necessary, shall be held on the second primary election date for county officers in that year, and the general election shall be held on the general election date for county officers in that year.

Nonpartisan primary and election method under

G.S. 163-294

, the primary shall be held on the primary election date for county officers in the second year following a federal decennial census, and the election shall be held on the date for the second primary for county officers in that year.

Nonpartisan plurality election method under

G.S. 163-292

, the election shall be held on the primary election date for county officers in the second year following a federal decennial census.

Election and runoff method under

G.S. 163-293

, the election shall be held on the primary election date for county officers in the second year following a federal decennial census, and the runoffs, if necessary, shall be held on the date for the second primary for county officers in that year.The organizational meeting of the new council may be held at any time after the results of the election have been officially determined and published, but not later than the time and date of the first regular meeting of the council in November of the second year following a federal decennial census, except in the case of partisan municipal elections, when the organizational meeting shall be held not later than the time and date of the first regular meeting of the council in December of the second year following a federal decennial census.

This section does not apply to any municipality that, under its charter, is not scheduled to hold an election in the year following a federal decennial census.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1012, s. 2; 1999-227, s. 4; 2000-140, s. 34; 2002-159, s. 52; 2009-414, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification, in consultation with the State Ethics Commission, the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State, and the new Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” near the end of subsection (a); substituted “163A-1615” for “163-291” in subdivision (d)(1); substituted “163A-1618” for “163-294” in subdivision (d)(2); substituted “163A-1616” for “163-292” in subdivision (d)(3); and substituted “163A-1617” for “163-293” in subdivision (d)(4).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.